New York, session 2025-2026, S5479.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 156.00 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 558 of the laws of 2006, is amended and a new 3 subdivision 10 is added to read as follows: 4 1. "Computer" means a device or group of devices which, by manipu- 5 lation of electronic, magnetic, optical or electrochemical impulses, 6 pursuant to a computer program, can automatically perform arithmetic, 7 logical, storage or retrieval operations with or on computer data, and 8 includes any connected or directly related device, equipment or facility 9 which enables such computer to store, retrieve or communicate to or from 10 a person, another computer or another device the results of computer 11 operations, computer programs or computer data. For the purposes of 12 this article, a smart phone or mobile device shall be considered a 13 computer. 14 10. "Smart phone or mobile device" means a portable computing device 15 that: (a) has a small form factor such that it can easily be carried by 16 a single individual; (b) is designed to operate without a physical 17 connection; (c) possesses local, non-removable or removable data stor- 18 age; and (d) includes a self-contained power source. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09716-01-5